Tennessee, session 114, SB1647.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-502, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection (d):
(1) In addition to the seizure and forfeiture provisions under subsection (c), in
any county or municipality that has passed a resolution or ordinance authorizing the
seizure and impoundment of a motor vehicle observed by law enforcement to have been
used to commit the offense of drag racing or to flee after commission of the offense of
drag racing, a law enforcement officer may seize and cause such vehicle to be
impounded in accordance with this subsection (d).
(2) A county or municipality may pass and implement a resolution or ordinance
authorizing the seizure and impoundment of a motor vehicle under this subsection (d);
provided, that the county or municipality and such resolution or ordinance must provide
for the following:
(A) A minimum number of hours, not to exceed one hundred twenty
(120), for which the vehicle is to be impounded before it can be released to the
owner upon payment of all reasonable and customary fees relating to the towing
and storage of the motor vehicle; and
(B) An administrative and judicial review process that enables the owner
of the vehicle to contest the propriety of the seizure, impoundment, and
associated fines and fees.
SB1647
009564
- 1 -

(3) For purposes of this subsection (d):
(A) "Impound" means removing a vehicle to a garage or storage lot
designated or maintained by a law enforcement agency; and
(B) "Owner" means a person who holds the legal title of a vehicle or to
whom the vehicle is registered, and includes an agent or authorized
representative of such person.
SECTION 2. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance
is held invalid, then the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end, the provisions of
this act are severable.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 009564